District of Columbia statutes.
16-2343.03

Default order.

If a respondent fails to appear at a hearing in any case in which parentage is at issue, a default order shall be entered upon a showing that (1) the respondent was served with notice of the action by any method permitted pursuant to section 46-206(b) , and (2) that the respondent received actual notice of the first, or any other hearing, where parentage is at issue which the respondent failed to attend. An ex parte hearing shall not be required before the entry of a default order.

Mar. 16, 1995, D.C. Law 10-223, § 2(j), 41 DCR 8051
July 25, 1995, D.C. Law 11-30, § 14, 42 DCR 1547
Apr. 18, 1996, D.C. Law 11-110, § 66, 43 DCR 530
Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-269, § 106(o), 48 DCR 1270
July 18, 2008, D.C. Law 18-33, § 3(l), 56 DCR 4269

Mayor authorized to issue rules: See note to § 16-2342.01.

Section 28(c)(7) of D.C. Law 15-354 provided that the section designation of § 16-2343.3 of the District of Columbia Official Code is redesignated as § 16-2343.03.

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 106(o) of Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-5, February 13, 2001, 48 DCR 2440).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 105(q) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-446, November 7, 2000, 47 DCR 9213).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 105(q) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-241, January 11, 2000, 47 DCR 581). For temporary (90-day) addition of § 16-2343.4 1981 Ed., see § 105(r) of the same Act.
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 105(q) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-177, November 2, 1999, 46 DCR 9678). For temporary (90-day) addition of § 16-2343.4 1981 Ed., see § 105(r) of the same Act.
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 105(q) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-126, August 4, 1999, 46 DCR 6606). For temporary (90-day) addition of § 16-2343.4 1981 Ed., see § 105(r) of the same Act.
For temporary repeal of D.C. Law 12-210, see § 113 of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-126, August 4, 1999, 46 DCR 6606).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 105(q) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-126, August 4, 1999, 46 DCR 6606).
For temporary repeal of D.C. Law 12-103, see § 13 of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Second Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-439, August 12, 1998, 45 DCR 6110).
Section 15 of D.C. Act 12-503 provided for the application of the act.
For temporary amendment of section, see § 5(q) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Second Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-439, August 12, 1998, 45 DCR 6110), § 5(q) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-503, October 27, 1998, 45 DCR 8495), § 5(q) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-600, January 20, 1999, 46 DCR 1239).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 5(o) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-222, December 23, 1997, 44 DCR 114), and § 5(o) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-309, March 20, 1998, 45 DCR 1923).
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 105(r) of Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Temporary Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Law 13-57, March 7, 2000, law notification 47 DCR 1979).
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 5(r) of Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-210, April 13, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 3832).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 105(q) of Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Temporary Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Law 13-207, March 31, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 3238).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 105(q) of Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Temporary Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Law 13-57, March 7, 2000, law notification 47 DCR 1979).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 5(q) of Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-210, April 13, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 3832).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 5(o) of Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-103, May 8, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 3254).
D.C. Law 18-33 substituted “respondent” for “putative father”, “parentage” for “paternity”, and “the respondent” for “he”.
“In the event the defendant fails to appear, a default order shall be entered in a paternity case upon a showing of service of process on the defendant.”
D.C. Law 13-269 rewrote the section which formerly read:
1981 Ed., § 16-2343.3.